Nebraska, session 109, LB1129.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1129 LB1129
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 18-2102, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
18-2102 It is hereby found and declared that there exist in cities
of all classes and villages of this state areas which have deteriorated
and become substandard and blighted because of the unsafe, insanitary,
inadequate, or overcrowded condition of the dwellings therein, or because
of inadequate planning of the area, or excessive land coverage by the
buildings thereon, or the lack of proper light and air and open space, or
because of the defective design and arrangement of the buildings thereon,
or faulty street or lot layout, or congested traffic conditions, or
economically or socially undesirable land uses, or the lack of affordable
housing in the area, or the existence of underdeveloped parcels that have
been within the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of the city for more
than twenty-five years. Such conditions or a combination of some or all
of them have resulted and will continue to result in making such areas
economic or social liabilities harmful to the social and economic well-
being of the entire communities in which they exist, needlessly
increasing public expenditures, imposing onerous municipal burdens,
decreasing the tax base, reducing tax revenue, substantially impairing or
arresting the sound growth of municipalities, aggravating traffic
problems, substantially impairing or arresting the elimination of traffic
hazards and the improvement of traffic facilities, and depreciating
general community-wide values. The existence of such areas contributes
substantially and increasingly to the spread of disease and crime,
necessitating excessive and disproportionate expenditures of public funds
for the preservation of the public health and safety, for crime
prevention, correction, prosecution, punishment and the treatment of
juvenile delinquency, and for the maintenance of adequate police, fire,
and accident protection and other public services and facilities. These
conditions are beyond remedy and control solely by regulatory process in
the exercise of the police power and cannot be dealt with effectively by
-2-

LB1129 LB1129
2026 2026
the ordinary operations of private enterprise without the aids herein
provided. The elimination of such conditions and the acquisition and
preparation of land in or necessary to the renewal of substandard and
blighted areas and its sale or lease for development or redevelopment in
accordance with general plans and redevelopment plans of communities and
any assistance which may be given by any state public body in connection
therewith are public uses and purposes for which public money may be
expended and private property acquired. The necessity in the public
interest for the provisions of the Community Development Law is hereby
declared to be a matter of legislative determination.
It is further found and declared that the prevention and elimination
of blight is a matter of state policy, public interest, and statewide
concern and within the powers and authority inhering in and reserved to
the state, in order that the state and its municipalities shall not
continue to be endangered by areas which are focal centers of disease,
promote juvenile delinquency, and consume an excessive proportion of
their revenue.
It is further found and declared that certain substandard and
blighted areas, or portions thereof, may require acquisition, clearance,
and disposition, subject to use restrictions, as provided in the
Community Development Law, since the prevailing conditions of decay may
make impracticable the reclamation of the area by conservation or
rehabilitation; that other areas or portions thereof may, through the
means provided in the Community Development Law, be susceptible of
conservation or rehabilitation in such a manner that the conditions and
evils, hereinbefore enumerated, may be eliminated, remedied, or
prevented; and that salvageable substandard and blighted areas can be
conserved and rehabilitated through appropriate public action and the
cooperation and voluntary action of the owners and tenants of property in
such areas.
Sec. 2. Section 18-2103, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
-3-

LB1129 LB1129
2026 2026
amended to read:
18-2103 For purposes of the Community Development Law, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Affordable housing means (a) workforce housing, (b) housing
targeted for households earning less than one hundred fifty percent of
the median income for the county in which such housing is located, or (c)
housing under section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(2) Area of operation means and includes the area within the
corporate limits of the city, the land that lies within the city's
extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction, and such land outside the city and
outside the city's extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction as may come
within the purview of section sections 18-2123 and 18-2123.01;
(3) Authority means any community redevelopment authority created
pursuant to section 18-2102.01 and any community development agency
created pursuant to section 18-2101.01 and does not include a limited
community redevelopment authority;
(4) Blighted area means an area (a) which, by reason of the presence
of a substantial number of deteriorated or deteriorating structures,
existence of defective or inadequate street layout, faulty lot layout in
relation to size, adequacy, accessibility, or usefulness, insanitary or
unsafe conditions, deterioration of site or other improvements, diversity
of ownership, tax or special assessment delinquency exceeding the fair
value of the land, defective or unusual conditions of title, improper
subdivision, obsolete or no platting, or the existence of conditions
which endanger life or property by fire and other causes, or the
existence of underdeveloped parcels that have been within the
extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of the city for more than twenty-
five years, or any combination of such factors, substantially impairs or
arrests the sound growth of the community, retards the provision of
housing accommodations, or constitutes an economic or social liability
and is detrimental to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare in
-4-

LB1129 LB1129
2026 2026
its present condition and use and (b) in which there is at least one of
the following conditions: (i) Unemployment in the designated area is at
least one hundred twenty percent of the state or national average; (ii)
the average age of the residential or commercial units in the area is at
least forty years; (iii) more than half of the plotted and subdivided
property in an area is unimproved land that has been within the city for
forty years and has remained unimproved during that time; (iv) the per
capita income of the area is lower than the average per capita income of
the city or village in which the area is designated; (v) the area has had
either stable or decreasing population based on the last two decennial
censuses; or (vi) less than twenty percent of the housing in the area is
affordable housing. In no event shall a city of the metropolitan,
primary, or first class designate more than thirty-five percent of the
city and the city's extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction as blighted, a
city of the second class shall not designate an area larger than fifty
percent of the city and the city's extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction
as blighted, and a village shall not designate an area larger than one
hundred percent of the village and the village's extraterritorial zoning
jurisdiction as blighted. A redevelopment project involving a formerly
used defense site as authorized under section 18-2123.01, any area which
is located within a good life district established under the Good Life
Transformational Projects Act, and any area declared to be an extremely
blighted area under section 18-2101.02 shall not count towards the
percentage limitations contained in this subdivision;
(5) Bonds means any bonds, including refunding bonds, notes, interim
certificates, debentures, or other obligations issued pursuant to the
Community Development Law except for bonds issued pursuant to section
18-2142.04;
(6) Business means any private business located in an enhanced
employment area;
(7) City means any city or incorporated village in the state;
-5-

LB1129 LB1129
2026 2026
(8) Clerk means the clerk of the city or village;
(9) Community redevelopment area means a substandard and blighted
area which the community redevelopment authority designates as
appropriate for a redevelopment project;
(10) Employee means a person employed at a business as a result of a
redevelopment project;
(11) Employer-provided health benefit means any item paid for by the
employer in total or in part that aids in the cost of health care
services, including, but not limited to, health insurance, health savings
accounts, and employer reimbursement of health care costs;
(12) Enhanced employment area means an area not exceeding six
hundred acres (a) within a community redevelopment area which is
designated by an authority as eligible for the imposition of an
occupation tax or (b) not within a community redevelopment area as may be
designated under section 18-2142.04;
(13) Equivalent employees means the number of employees computed by
(a) dividing the total hours to be paid in a year by (b) the product of
forty times the number of weeks in a year;
(14) Extremely blighted area means: a
(a) A substandard and blighted area in which: (i) (a) The average
rate of unemployment in the area during the period covered by the most
recent American Community Survey 5-Year Estimate is at least one hundred
fifty two hundred percent of the average rate of unemployment in the
state during the same period; and (ii) (b) the average poverty rate in
the area exceeds fifteen twenty percent for the total federal census
tract or tracts or federal census block group or block groups in the
area; or
(b) A substandard and blighted area that has a higher-than-average
unemployment rate and a higher-than-average poverty rate when compared to
the rest of the state, as determined by the governing body of the city.
In making such determination, the governing body may use any information
-6-

LB1129 LB1129
2026 2026
available to such governing body. This subdivision (b) shall only apply
if the governing body determines that the federal data described in
subdivision (14)(a) of this section is unreliable or lacking for the area
in question;
(15) Federal government means the United States of America, or any
agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States
of America;
(16) Governing body or local governing body means the city council,
board of trustees, or other legislative body charged with governing the
municipality;
(17) Limited community redevelopment authority means a community
redevelopment authority created pursuant to section 18-2102.01 having
only one single specific limited pilot project authorized;
(18) Mayor means the mayor of the city or chairperson of the board
of trustees of the village;
(19) New investment means the value of improvements to real estate
made in an enhanced employment area by a developer or a business;
(20) Number of new employees means the number of equivalent
employees that are employed at a business as a result of the
redevelopment project during a year that are in excess of the number of
equivalent employees during the year immediately prior to the year that a
redevelopment plan is adopted;
(21) Obligee means any bondholder, agent, or trustee for any
bondholder, or lessor demising to any authority, established pursuant to
section 18-2102.01, property used in connection with a redevelopment
project, or any assignee or assignees of such lessor's interest or any
part thereof, and the federal government when it is a party to any
contract with such authority;
(22) Occupation tax means a tax imposed under section 18-2142.02;
(23) Person means any individual, firm, partnership, limited
liability company, corporation, company, association, joint-stock
-7-

LB1129 LB1129
2026 2026
association, or body politic and includes any trustee, receiver,
assignee, or other similar representative thereof;
(24) Public body means the state or any municipality, county,
township, board, commission, authority, district, or other political
subdivision or public body of the state;
(25) Real property means all lands, including improvements and
fixtures thereon, and property of any nature appurtenant thereto, or used
in connection therewith, and every estate, interest and right, legal or
equitable, therein, including terms for years and liens by way of
judgment, mortgage, or otherwise, and the indebtedness secured by such
liens;
(26) Redeveloper means any person, partnership, or public or private
corporation or agency which enters or proposes to enter into a
redevelopment contract;
(27) Redevelopment contract means a contract entered into between an
authority and a redeveloper for the redevelopment of an area in
conformity with a redevelopment plan;
(28) Redevelopment plan means a plan, as it exists from time to time
for one or more community redevelopment areas, or for a redevelopment
project, which (a) conforms to the general plan for the municipality as a
whole and (b) is sufficiently complete to indicate such land acquisition,
demolition and removal of structures, redevelopment, improvements, and
rehabilitation as may be proposed to be carried out in the community
redevelopment area, zoning and planning changes, if any, land uses,
maximum densities, and building requirements;
(29) Redevelopment project means any work or undertaking in one or
more community redevelopment areas: (a) To acquire substandard and
blighted areas or portions thereof, including lands, structures, or
improvements the acquisition of which is necessary or incidental to the
proper clearance, development, or redevelopment of such substandard and
blighted areas; (b) to clear any such areas by demolition or removal of
-8-

LB1129 LB1129
2026 2026
existing buildings, structures, streets, utilities, or other improvements
thereon and to install, construct, or reconstruct streets, utilities,
parks, playgrounds, public spaces, public parking facilities, sidewalks
or moving sidewalks, convention and civic centers, bus stop shelters,
lighting, benches or other similar furniture, trash receptacles,
shelters, skywalks and pedestrian and vehicular overpasses and
underpasses, enhancements to structures in the redevelopment plan area
which exceed minimum building and design standards in the community and
prevent the recurrence of substandard and blighted conditions, and any
other necessary public improvements essential to the preparation of sites
for uses in accordance with a redevelopment plan; (c) to sell, lease, or
otherwise make available land in such areas for residential,
recreational, commercial, industrial, or other uses, including parking or
other facilities functionally related or subordinate to such uses, or for
public use or to retain such land for public use, in accordance with a
redevelopment plan; and may also include the preparation of the
redevelopment plan, the planning, survey, and other work incident to a
redevelopment project and the preparation of all plans and arrangements
for carrying out a redevelopment project; (d) to dispose of all real and
personal property or any interest in such property, or assets, cash, or
other funds held or used in connection with residential, recreational,
commercial, industrial, or other uses, including parking or other
facilities functionally related or subordinate to such uses, or any
public use specified in a redevelopment plan or project, except that such
disposition shall be at its fair value for uses in accordance with the
redevelopment plan; (e) to acquire real property in a community
redevelopment area which, under the redevelopment plan, is to be repaired
or rehabilitated for dwelling use or related facilities, repair or
rehabilitate the structures, and resell the property; (f) to carry out
plans for a program of voluntary or compulsory repair, rehabilitation, or
demolition of buildings in accordance with the redevelopment plan; and
-9-

LB1129 LB1129
2026 2026
(g) to carry out construction of affordable housing; and (h) to carry out
the development of underdeveloped parcels that have been within the
extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of the city for more than twenty-
five years;
(30) Redevelopment project valuation means the valuation for
assessment of the taxable real property in a redevelopment project last
certified for the year prior to the effective date of the provision
authorized in section 18-2147;
(31) Rural community means any municipality in a county with a
population of fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined
by the most recent federal decennial census;
(32) Substandard area means (a) an area in which less than twenty
percent of the housing is affordable housing, (b) an area or in which
there is a predominance of buildings or improvements, whether
nonresidential or residential in character, which, by reason of
dilapidation, deterioration, age or obsolescence, inadequate provision
for ventilation, light, air, sanitation, or open spaces, high density of
population and overcrowding, or the existence of conditions which
endanger life or property by fire and other causes, or any combination of
such factors, is conducive to ill health, transmission of disease, infant
mortality, juvenile delinquency, and crime, (which cannot be remedied
through construction of prisons), and is detrimental to the public
health, safety, morals, or welfare, or (c) an area within the city's
extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction that contains underdeveloped parcels
that have been underdeveloped for more than twenty-five years; and
(33) Workforce housing means:
(a) Housing that meets the needs of today's working families;
(b) Housing that is attractive to new residents considering
relocation to a rural community;
(c) Owner-occupied housing units that cost not more than two hundred
seventy-five thousand dollars to construct or rental housing units that
-10-

LB1129 LB1129
2026 2026
cost not more than two hundred thousand dollars per unit to construct.
For purposes of this subdivision (c), housing unit costs shall be updated
annually by the Department of Economic Development based upon the most
recent increase or decrease in the Producer Price Index for all
commodities, published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau
of Labor Statistics;
(d) Owner-occupied and rental housing units for which the cost to
substantially rehabilitate exceeds fifty percent of a unit's assessed
value; and
(e) Upper-story housing.
Sec. 3. Section 18-2108, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
18-2108 An authority shall not acquire real property for a
redevelopment project within the corporate limits of a city or a city's
extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction unless the governing body of such
the city in which the redevelopment project area is located has approved
the redevelopment plan, as prescribed in section 18-2116 or 18-2155.
Sec. 4. Section 18-2123, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
18-2123 Upon a determination, by resolution, of the governing body
of the city in which such land is located, that the acquisition and
development of undeveloped vacant land, not within a substandard and
blighted area, is essential to the proper clearance or redevelopment of
substandard and blighted areas or a necessary part of the general
community redevelopment program of the city, or that the acquisition and
development of land outside the city, but within a radius of three miles
thereof, is necessary or convenient to the proper clearance or
redevelopment of one or more substandard and blighted areas within the
city or is a necessary adjunct to the general community redevelopment
program of the city, the acquisition, planning, and preparation for
development or disposal of such land shall constitute a redevelopment
-11-

LB1129 LB1129
2026 2026
project which may be undertaken by the authority in the manner provided
in the Community Development Law.
Sec. 5. Section 18-2123.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
18-2123.01 (1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of the Community
Development Law to the contrary, a city may undertake a redevelopment
project that includes real property located outside the corporate limits
of such city and outside the city's extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction
if the following requirements have been met:
(a) The real property located outside the corporate limits of the
city and outside the city's extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction is a
formerly used defense site;
(b) The formerly used defense site is located within the same county
as the city approving such redevelopment project;
(c) The formerly used defense site is located within a sanitary and
improvement district;
(d) The governing body of the city approving such redevelopment
project passes an ordinance stating such city's intent to annex the
formerly used defense site in the future; and
(e) The redevelopment project has been consented to by any city
exercising extraterritorial jurisdiction over the formerly used defense
site.
(2) For purposes of this section, formerly used defense site means
real property that was formerly owned by, leased to, or otherwise
possessed by the United States and under the jurisdiction of the United
States Secretary of Defense. Formerly used defense site does not include
missile silos.
(3) The inclusion of a formerly used defense site in any
redevelopment project under this section shall not result in:
(a) Any change in the service area of any electric utility or
natural gas utility unless such change has been agreed to by the electric
-12-

LB1129 LB1129
2026 2026
utility or natural gas utility serving the formerly used defense site at
the time of approval of such redevelopment project; or
(b) Any change in the service area of any communications company as
defined in section 77-2734.04 unless (i) such change has been agreed to
by the communications company serving the formerly used defense site at
the time of approval of such redevelopment project or (ii) such change
occurs pursuant to sections 86-135 to 86-138.
(4) A city approving a redevelopment project under this section and
the county in which the formerly used defense site is located may enter
into an agreement pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act in which the
county agrees to reimburse such city for any services the city provides
to the formerly used defense site after approval of the redevelopment
project.
Sec. 6. Section 18-2147, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
18-2147 (1) Any redevelopment plan as originally approved or as
later modified pursuant to section 18-2117 may contain a provision that
any ad valorem tax levied upon real property, or any portion thereof, in
a redevelopment project for the benefit of any public body shall be
divided, for the applicable period described in subsection (4) of this
section, as follows:
(a) That portion of the ad valorem tax which is produced by the levy
at the rate fixed each year by or for each such public body upon the
redevelopment project valuation shall be paid into the funds of each such
public body in the same proportion as are all other taxes collected by or
for the body. When there is not a redevelopment project valuation on a
parcel or parcels, the county assessor shall determine the redevelopment
project valuation based upon the fair market valuation of the parcel or
parcels as of January 1 of the year prior to the year that the ad valorem
taxes are to be divided. The county assessor shall provide written notice
of the redevelopment project valuation to the authority as defined in
-13-

LB1129 LB1129
2026 2026
section 18-2103 and the owner. The authority or owner may protest the
valuation to the county board of equalization within thirty days after
the date of the valuation notice. All provisions of section 77-1502
except dates for filing of a protest, the period for hearing protests,
and the date for mailing notice of the county board of equalization's
decision are applicable to any protest filed pursuant to this section.
The county board of equalization shall decide any protest filed pursuant
to this section within thirty days after the filing of the protest. The
county clerk shall mail a copy of the decision made by the county board
of equalization on protests pursuant to this section to the authority or
owner within seven days after the board's decision. Any decision of the
county board of equalization may be appealed to the Tax Equalization and
Review Commission, in accordance with section 77-5013, within thirty days
after the date of the decision;
(b) That portion of the ad valorem tax on real property, as provided
in the redevelopment contract, bond resolution, or redevelopment plan, as
applicable, in the redevelopment project in excess of such amount, if
any, shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid into a special fund
of the authority to be used solely to pay the principal of, the interest
on, and any premiums due in connection with the bonds of, loans, notes,
or advances of money to, or indebtedness incurred by, whether funded,
refunded, assumed, or otherwise, such authority for financing or
refinancing, in whole or in part, the redevelopment project. When such
bonds, loans, notes, advances of money, or indebtedness, including
interest and premiums due, have been paid, the authority shall so notify
the county assessor and county treasurer and all ad valorem taxes upon
taxable real property in such a redevelopment project shall be paid into
the funds of the respective public bodies. An authority may use a single
fund for purposes of this subdivision for all redevelopment projects or
may use a separate fund for each redevelopment project; and
(c) Any interest and penalties due for delinquent taxes shall be
-14-

LB1129 LB1129
2026 2026
paid into the funds of each public body in the same proportion as are all
other taxes collected by or for the public body.
(2) To the extent that a redevelopment plan authorizes the division
of ad valorem taxes levied upon only a portion of the real property
included in such redevelopment plan, any improvements funded by such
division of taxes shall be related to the redevelopment plan that
authorized such division of taxes.
(3)(a) For any redevelopment plan located in a city of the
metropolitan class that includes a division of taxes, as provided in this
section, that produces, in whole or in part, funds to be used directly or
indirectly for (i) new construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition of
housing for households with annual incomes below the area median income
for households and located within six hundred yards of a public passenger
streetcar or (ii) new construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition of
single-family housing or condominium housing used as primary residences
for individuals with annual incomes below the area median income for
individuals, such housing shall be deemed related to the redevelopment
plan that authorized such division of taxes regardless of whether such
housing is or will be located on real property within such redevelopment
plan, as long as such housing supports activities occurring on or
identified in such redevelopment plan.
(b) During each fiscal year in which the funds described in
subdivision (a) of this subsection are available, the authority and city
shall make best efforts to allocate not less than thirty percent of such
funds to single-family housing deemed related to the redevelopment plan
described under such subdivision.
(c) In selecting projects to receive funding, the authority and city
shall develop a qualified allocation plan and give first priority to
financially viable projects that serve the lowest income occupants for
the longest period of time.
(4)(a) For any redevelopment plan for which more than fifty percent
-15-

LB1129 LB1129
2026 2026
of the property in the redevelopment project area has been declared an
extremely blighted area in accordance with section 18-2101.02, ad valorem
taxes shall be divided for a period not to exceed twenty years after the
effective date as identified in the project redevelopment contract or in
the resolution of the authority authorizing the issuance of bonds
pursuant to section 18-2124.
(b) For all other redevelopment plans, ad valorem taxes shall be
divided for a period not to exceed fifteen years after the effective date
as identified in the project redevelopment contract, in the resolution of
the authority authorizing the issuance of bonds pursuant to section
18-2124, or in the redevelopment plan, whichever is applicable.
(5) The effective date of a provision dividing ad valorem taxes as
provided in subsection (4) of this section shall not occur until such
time as the real property in the redevelopment project is within the
corporate boundaries of the city or within the city's extraterritorial
zoning jurisdiction. This subsection shall not apply to a redevelopment
project involving a formerly used defense site as authorized in section
18-2123.01.
(6) All notices of the provision for dividing ad valorem taxes shall
be sent by the authority to the county assessor on forms prescribed by
the Property Tax Administrator. The notice shall be sent to the county
assessor on or before July 1 of the year of the effective date of the
provision. Failure to satisfy the notice requirement of this section
shall result in the taxes, for all taxable years affected by the failure
to give notice of the effective date of the provision, remaining
undivided and being paid into the funds for each public body receiving
property taxes generated by the property in the redevelopment project.
However, the redevelopment project valuation for the remaining division
of ad valorem taxes in accordance with subdivisions (1)(a) and (b) of
this section shall be the last certified valuation for the taxable year
prior to the effective date of the provision to divide the taxes for the
-16-

LB1129 LB1129
2026 2026
remaining portion of the twenty-year or fifteen-year period pursuant to
subsection (4) of this section.
Sec. 7. Section 18-2155, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
18-2155 (1) The governing body of a city may elect by resolution to
allow expedited reviews of redevelopment plans that meet the requirements
of subsection (2) of this section. A redevelopment plan that receives an
expedited review pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the
requirements of sections 18-2111 to 18-2115 and 18-2116.
(2) A redevelopment plan is eligible for expedited review under this
section if:
(a) The redevelopment plan includes only one redevelopment project;
(b) The redevelopment project involves:
(i) The repair, rehabilitation, or replacement of an existing
structure that has been within the corporate limits of the city or the
city's extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction for at least sixty years and
is located within a substandard and blighted area; or
(ii) The redevelopment of a vacant lot that is located within a
substandard and blighted area that has been within the corporate limits
of the city or the city's extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction for at
least sixty years and has been platted for at least sixty years;
(c) The redevelopment project is located in a county with a
population of less than one hundred thousand inhabitants; and
(d) The assessed value of the property within the redevelopment
project area when the project is complete is estimated to be no more
than:
(i) Three hundred fifty thousand dollars for a redevelopment project
involving a single-family residential structure;
(ii) One million five hundred thousand dollars for a redevelopment
project involving a multi-family residential structure or commercial
structure; or
-17-

LB1129 LB1129
2026 2026
(iii) Ten million dollars for a redevelopment project involving the
revitalization of a structure included in the National Register of
Historic Places.
(3) The governing body of a city that elects to allow expedited
reviews of redevelopment plans under this section may establish by
resolution an annual limit on the number of such redevelopment plans that
may be approved by the governing body.
(4) The expedited review shall consist of the following steps:
(a) A redeveloper shall prepare the redevelopment plan using a
standard form developed by the Department of Economic Development. The
form shall include (i) the existing uses and condition of the property
within the redevelopment project area, (ii) the proposed uses of the
property within the redevelopment project area, (iii) the number of years
the existing structure has been within the corporate limits of the city
or the city's extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction or the number of years
that the vacant lot has been platted within the corporate limits of the
city or the city's extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction, whichever is
applicable, (iv) the current assessed value of the property within the
redevelopment project area, (v) the increase in the assessed value of the
property within the redevelopment project area that is estimated to occur
as a result of the redevelopment project, (vi) an indication of whether
the redevelopment project will be financed in whole or in part through
the division of taxes as provided in section 18-2147, and (vii) the
agreed-upon costs of the redevelopment project;
(b) The redeveloper shall submit the redevelopment plan directly to
the governing body along with an application fee in an amount set by the
governing body, not to exceed fifty dollars. Such application fee shall
be separate from any fees for building permits or other permits needed
for the project; and
(c) The governing body shall determine whether to approve or deny
the redevelopment plan within thirty days after submission of the plan. A
-18-

LB1129 LB1129
2026 2026
redevelopment plan may be denied if:
(i) The redevelopment plan does not meet the requirements of
subsection (2) of this section;
(ii) Approval of the redevelopment plan would exceed the annual
limit established under subsection (3) of this section; or
(iii) The redevelopment plan is inconsistent with the city's
comprehensive development plan.
(5) Each city may select the appropriate employee or department to
conduct expedited reviews pursuant to this section.
(6) For any approved redevelopment project that is financed in whole
or in part through the division of taxes as provided in section 18-2147:
(a) The authority shall incur indebtedness related to the
redevelopment project which shall not exceed the lesser of the agreed-
upon costs of the redevelopment project or the amount estimated to be
generated over a fifteen-year period from the portion of taxes mentioned
in subdivision (1)(b) of section 18-2147. Such indebtedness shall not
create a general obligation on behalf of the authority or the city in the
event that the amount generated over a fifteen-year period from the
portion of taxes mentioned in subdivision (1)(b) of section 18-2147 does
not equal the costs of the agreed-upon work to repair, rehabilitate, or
replace the structure or to redevelop the vacant lot as provided in the
redevelopment plan;
(b) Upon completion of the agreed-upon work to repair, rehabilitate,
or replace the structure or to redevelop the vacant lot as provided in
the redevelopment plan, the redeveloper shall notify the county assessor
of such completion; and
(c) The county assessor shall then determine:
(i) Whether the redevelopment project is complete. Redevelopment
projects must be completed within two years after the redevelopment plan
is approved under this section; and
(ii) The assessed value of the property within the redevelopment
-19-

LB1129 LB1129
2026 2026
project area.
(7) After the county assessor makes the determinations required
under subdivision (6)(c) of this section, the county assessor shall use a
standard certification form developed by the Department of Revenue to
certify to the authority:
(a) That improvements have been made and completed;
(b) That a valuation increase has occurred;
(c) The amount of the valuation increase; and
(d) That the valuation increase was due to the improvements made.
(8) Once the county assessor has made the certification required
under subsection (7) of this section, the authority may begin to use the
portion of taxes mentioned in subdivision (1)(b) of section 18-2147 to
pay the indebtedness incurred by the authority under subdivision (6)(a)
of this section.
(9) The payments shall be remitted to the holder of the
indebtedness. The changes made to this subsection by Laws 2023, LB531,
shall be retroactive in application and shall apply to redevelopment
plans approved prior to, on, or after June 7, 2023.
(10) A single fund may be used for all redevelopment projects that
receive an expedited review pursuant to this section. It shall not be
necessary to create a separate fund for any such project, including a
project financed in whole or in part through the division of taxes as
provided in section 18-2147.
(11) The governing body of a city that elects to allow expedited
reviews of redevelopment plans under this section may revoke such
election by resolution at any time. The revocation of such election shall
not affect the validity of (a) any redevelopment plan or redevelopment
project that was approved under this section prior to the revocation of
such election or (b) any indebtedness incurred by the authority under
subdivision (6)(a) of this section prior to the revocation of such
election.
-20-

LB1129 LB1129
2026 2026
Sec. 8. Original sections 18-2108, 18-2123, and 18-2123.01, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, section 18-2155, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and sections 18-2102, 18-2103, and 18-2147,
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-21-